Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 44 Claims Upon the Treasury

44.001.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Local government” means any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local government of the Commonwealth;

“Warrant” has the same meaning as in KRS

41.010

; and

“Writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 88, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 155, § 21, effective June 29, 2021.

44.010.
Claims upon State Treasury, how paid.

All claims upon the State Treasury that are authorized by law shall be paid when due by the State Treasurer to the person entitled to the amount claimed. The warrant for such payment shall be issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon such proof of services performed or of demand made as is required by law.

History.

340: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

44.020.
Claims allowed by courts — Contest.

Within three (3) working days after the first and fifteenth of each month, the sheriff, or any other public official with a claim payable from the State Treasury for duties performed in any court of the Court of Justice, shall make out the claim and have it certified by the judge of the court as allowable for payment, and transmit the list to the Department for Local Government. The claim approved by the judge of the court shall serve as an order of allowance notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary. The Department for Local Government shall keep a separate record of all claims allowed in each county, noting the number and amount of each warrant issued for the payment of the claims.

The order of any court authorized by law to approve and allow fee bills, settlements, credits, charges, and other claims against the State Treasury shall not be treated as a judgment, or made conclusive against the state, but shall only be regarded as prima facie evidence of the correctness and legality of the fee bill, settlement, credit, charge, or claim. The Department for Local Government, if it believes the fee bill, settlement, credit, charge, or claim to be fraudulent, erroneous, or illegal, may, upon the advice of the Attorney General, refuse to pay and may contest the claim in the Franklin Circuit Court, which shall have exclusive jurisdiction of all actions against the Department for Local Government to compel the payment of claims against the State Treasury.

History.

340a-1, 359: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 191; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1976, ch. 62, § 51; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 13; 1978, ch. 384, § 123, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 136, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 69, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 26, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 32, effective July 15, 2010.

44.030.
Money not to be paid to state or local government debtor — Priority of multiple claims — Matching child support obligors and claimants — Information on debts referred to Department of Revenue to be provided to State Treasurer.

No money shall be paid to any person on a claim against the state in his or her own right, or as an assignee of another, when the person or the person’s assignor is indebted to the state or any local government. The claim, to the extent it is allowed, shall first be credited to the account of the person indebted to the state, and if there is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the state, any certified liquidated debts of any local government shall be paid if the local government provides information concerning the liquidated debt to the State Treasurer. If there is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the state or local governments, and if there are not liquidated debts certified against the claim pursuant to KRS

44.065

, that balance shall be paid to the person.

In case of multiple claims by state agencies, the claims shall be paid as follows:

First, to any claim made by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for past due child support obligations;

Second, to any claim filed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue, for taxes owed the Commonwealth; and

Third, to all other state agencies in the order that the claims were filed with the State Treasury.

In the case of multiple claims filed by any local government, the claims shall be paid in the order that the claims were filed with the State Treasury.

No money shall be paid to any person on a claim against a local government in his or her own right, or as an assignee of another, when the person or the person’s assignor is indebted to the local government or the state. The claim, to the extent it is allowed, shall first be credited to any debt of the person indebted to the local government, and if there is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the local government, any certified liquidated debts of the state shall be paid if the state provides the local government with information concerning the liquidated debt. If there is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the local government or the state, that balance shall be paid to the person.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide the Cabinet for Health and Family Services with a quarterly report of all tort claims made against the state by individuals that the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall compare with the child support database to match individuals who have a child support arrearage and may receive a settlement from the state.

Each organizational unit and administrative body in the executive branch of state government, as defined in KRS

12.010

, the Court of Justice in the judicial branch of state government, and, where feasible, any local government shall provide information to the State Treasurer concerning any debt it has referred to the Department of Revenue for collection under KRS

45.241

.

Each agency, the Court of Justice, and, where feasible, any local government shall provide information to the State Treasurer concerning any debt referred to the Department of Revenue for collection under KRS

45.237

.

History.

4701; 2000, ch. 430, § 17, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 118, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 192, § 4, effective April 21, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 59, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 104, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XVI, § 1, effective April 25, 2006; 2013, ch. 88, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

44.040.
Mileage allowance, how computed.

When any allowance for mileage is made by the state, the number of miles shall be computed upon the route most usually traveled.

History.

341.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where an officer conveys different types of prisoners or patients at the same time to institutions operated by different departments, he shall apportion the mileage cost to each department.

OAG 62-713

.

44.045.
Motor vehicles, purchase for state use — License plates — Markings and administrative regulations.

A passenger motor vehicle or vehicles may be purchased by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the use of the Governor and the Lieutenant Governor.

Motor vehicles, including passenger motor vehicles, may be purchased by the Finance and Administration Cabinet as are deemed necessary by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet for the discharge of the authorized duties and functions of the various agencies of the state. The vehicles shall be used for official purposes only and for no other purposes. The assignment of passenger motor vehicles to specific individuals shall be discouraged but may be made upon approval by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet of a written request to make the assignment by the head of the agency involved.

All motor vehicles purchased pursuant to this section shall be issued official license plates and shall bear on one (1) door on each side the great seal of the Commonwealth, and the words “For official use only.” It shall not be necessary that the vehicles purchased pursuant to subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this section bear the seal and the words.

The Department of Revenue, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the Department of Law may, upon approval by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet of a written request by the head of the agency involved, register a vehicle or vehicles under KRS

186.020

and be issued regular license plates. The vehicles shall be used for investigatory purposes only and for no other purposes.

The Administrative Office of the Courts may register a vehicle or vehicles used by Justices and Judges of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals under KRS

186.020

and be issued regular license plates.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may adopt administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A necessary to govern the use of those state-owned vehicles acquired pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Any person violating subsections (2) and (4) of this section shall, on conviction thereof, be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS

44.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 175, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(1); 1990, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 305, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2007, ch. 85, § 124, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(8/18/2011). 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 12, relating to the reorganization of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in subsection (6) of this section.

Compiler's Notes.

This section has been reprinted to correct errors appearing in the bound volume.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

State-owned vehicles, marking, exceptions, KRS

186.065

.

44.050.
Motor vehicles, when may be purchased out of state funds.

The Department of Military Affairs is hereby authorized to purchase from state funds motor trucks to be used in the carrying out of the functions of this department, and it is further provided that the Department of Military Affairs may acquire motor vehicles by gift or transfer from the federal government for use in said department.

History.

2739-9, 2739g-70, 2739g-71, 2739g-74, 2739g-77: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 77, § 2; 1944, ch. 27; 1950, ch. 77; 1968, ch. 175, § 3.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

State Police division may purchase and use motor vehicles, KRS

16.070

.

44.055.
Insuring state vehicles — Blanket liability policy — Effect on sovereign immunity — Eligibility of insurers.

Any state agency, as defined in KRS Chapter 12, may in its discretion, for the protection of the public and its employees, expend state funds to purchase policies of insurance of all kinds deemed advisable covering vehicles, including boats, owned by the state and operated by state employees when in the conduct of official business. The executive director of insurance, upon recommendation of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall initiate and be responsible for the purchase of a blanket liability insurance policy to cover the officers and employees of the several state agencies and shall determine, by administrative regulation, the policy limits that shall be applicable to the persons covered in each such affected agency not to exceed the limit prescribed in KRS

49.040

.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity and claims against the Commonwealth, its agencies, officers, employees, or insurers may be asserted only in the manner set forth in KRS

49.040

to

49.180

.

Policies authorized by this section shall be purchased only from insurers authorized to do business in this state and shall be countersigned by a licensed resident agent.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 125; 1960, ch. 180; 1994, ch. 372, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 74, § 61, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

44.060.
Expense of operating vehicle used by state officer, employee, or agent.

When any state officer, member of a state board or commission, or any subordinate officer, agent, or employee thereof is authorized by law to and does incur, in the discharge of his official duties, any expense incident to traveling in his own motor vehicle, the amount allowed for such expense shall be fixed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet which sum shall include depreciation and investment charges incident to the operation of the motor vehicle.

History.

2739g-72: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 85; 1958, ch. 85; 1968, ch. 60, § 1; 1974, ch. 296, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1978, ch. 155, § 41, effective January 1, 1978.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 34 at 1752.

44.065.
Reciprocal agreements to offset claim of any person against the Commonwealth to debt of that person owed to any federal, state, or local government.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, and pursuant to the provisions of 31

U.S.C. sec. 3716(b)

and (h)(1), the Finance and Administration Cabinet, at the request of any executive, judicial, or legislative agency of the Commonwealth, may enter into a reciprocal agreement with the United States government to offset the claim of any person against the Commonwealth to any debt of that person owed to the United States government which has been certified by the United States government as final, due, and owing, with all appeals and legal actions having been waived or exhausted, and to offset any nontax claim of any person against the United States government to any liquidated debt of that person owed to the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the Finance and Administration Cabinet, at the request of any executive, judicial, or legislative agency of the Commonwealth, may enter into a reciprocal agreement with any state, as defined in KRS

446.010

, to offset the claim of any person against the Commonwealth to any debt of that person owed to any state which has certified the debt as final, due, and owing, with all appeals and legal actions having been waived or exhausted, and to offset any claim of any person against any state to any liquidated debt of that person owed to the Commonwealth.

In the case of multiple creditors who have certified liquidated debt against the same person on a claim against the Commonwealth, pursuant to this section and KRS

44.030

, the debts of the Commonwealth, counties, cities, urban-county governments, consolidated local governments, and charter county governments shall be credited first in the priority established in KRS

44.030

, and if there is any balance due the claimant after settling the whole demands of the Commonwealth, counties, cities, urban-county governments, consolidated local governments, and charter county governments, the balance shall be credited to the liquidated debts certified by the United States government and any other state, as defined in KRS

446.010

, in the order that the claims were filed with the Treasury. If there is a balance due the claimant after satisfaction of all liquidated debts as itemized in this section or any court-ordered payments, the balance shall be paid to the claimant.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XVI, § 2, effective April 25, 2006; 2011, ch. 2, § 104, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/25/2006). This statute, as created by
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 252, Pt. XVI. sec. 2, contained internal references in subsections (2) and (3) to “KRS 446.010(30).” Under
KRS 7.136(1)(e), these references have been changed in codification to “KRS 446.010(31)” by the Reviser of Statutes to reflect the insertion of a new subsection (24) in
KRS

446.020

and the resulting renumbering of succeeding subsections in
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 149, sec. 237.